Hawaii, session 2025, SB268.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that iwi kupuna (ancestral remains) hold profound spiritual and cultural significance for Native Hawaiian people.  The practice of malama iwi kupuna (caring for ancestral remains) is an essential part of Native Hawaiian traditions and is typically a kuleana (responsibility) reserved for ohana (family).  Native Hawaiian burial beliefs, customs, and practices ensure that the remains of ancestors are treated with the utmost respect and that their spiritual connection to the land and their descendants is honored. The legislature further finds that island burial councils play a critical role in preserving iwi kupuna and upholding Native Hawaiian burial practices.  While the membership of each council currently includes representatives from specified geographic regions, as well as representatives having development and large property owner interests, the primary criterion for regional representatives is an understanding of Hawaiian culture and history and the burial beliefs, customs, and practices of Native Hawaiians.  However, no similar criterion exists for landowner and developer representatives. The legislature recognizes that to fully align the composition of island burial council with Hawaiian values related to malalma iwi kupuna, representatives of development and property owner interests are not necessary members.  The inclusion of these representatives may detract from the council's focus on the care and protection of iwi kupuna, which is a deeply spiritual and cultural responsibility. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to align the composition of island burial councils with values related to malama iwi kapuna by ensuring that the councils are composed primarily of persons with a deep understanding of Native Hawaiian cultural practices, removing the requirement for representatives having development and large property owner interests, and decreasing the overall composition of the island burial councils. SECTION 2.  Section 6E-43.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by: 1.   Amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a)  There shall be established within the department five island burial councils, one each for Hawai`i, Maui/Lāna`i, Moloka`i, O`ahu, and Kaua`i/Ni`ihau, to implement section 6E-43.  Each council shall consist of [nine] seven members, except the Moloka`i council, which shall consist of five members.  [Each council shall consist of no more than three representatives of development and large landowner interests; provided that the Moloka`i council shall consist of no more than one representative of development and large landowner interests.]  The [remaining] council members shall represent the geographic regions identified in paragraphs (1) through (5).  At all times, at least two of the regional representatives of each council shall have been appointed from a list of nominees submitted to the governor by the office of Hawaiian affairs, as provided under subsection (b).  Each council shall include at least one representative for each geographic region identified as follows: (1)  The Hawai`i council shall include the following geographic regions:  Kohala, Kona, Ka`ū, Puna, Hilo, and Hāmākua; (2)  The Maui/Lāna`i council shall include the following geographic regions:  Honua`ula, Lahaina, Wailuku, Makawao, Hāna, and Lāna`i; (3)  The Moloka`i council shall include the following geographic regions:  West Moloka`i, Central Moloka`i, East Moloka`i, and Kalawao; (4)  The O`ahu council shall include the following geographic regions:  Wai`ānae, `Ewa, Kona, Ko`olaupoko, Ko`olauloa, and Waialua; and (5)  The Kaua`i/Ni`ihau council shall include the following geographic regions:  Waimea/Na Pali, Kōloa, Līhu`e, Kawaihau, Hanalei, and Ni`ihau. Regional representatives shall be selected from the Hawaiian community on the basis of the representatives' understanding of the culture, history, burial beliefs, customs, and practices of native Hawaiians in the region they each represent." 2.   By amending subsection (e) to read as follows: "(e)  The department, in consultation with the councils, office of Hawaiian affairs, [representatives of development and large landowner interests,] and appropriate Hawaiian organizations, such as Hui Malama I Na Kupuna O Hawai`i Nei, shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.  The council members shall serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for necessary expenses incurred during the performance of their duties.  The councils shall be a part of the department for administrative purposes." SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ By Request